Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5118.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-28.2 of the General Laws entitled "Police Officers - Commission
on Standards and Training" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-28.2-8.6. Educational requirements -- Development disability recognition training.
The commission on standards and training shall prepare and publish mandatory training
standards to provide instruction for police officers in identifying, responding to, handling,
investigating and reporting all incidents involving any person with a "developmental disability" as
defined in § 40.1-1-8.1. The commission shall include this training in all curricula for recruits and
in-service trainees, and in all police academies operated or certified by the commission.
SECTION 2. Section 40.1-1-8.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 40.1-1 entitled
"Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40.1-1-8.1. “Developmental disability” defined.
The term “developmental disability” means a severe, chronic disability of a person that:
(1) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical
impairments;
(2) Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22) at any age;
(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(4) Results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the following areas

of major life activity:
(i) Self-care;
(ii) Receptive and expressive language;
(iii) Learning;
(iv) Mobility;
(v) Self-direction;
(vi) Capacity for independent living; and
(vii) Economic self-sufficiency; and
(5) Reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary,
or generic care, treatment, or other services that are of lifelong or extended duration and are
individually planned and coordinated.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000102
========
LC000102 - Page 2 of 3